Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Chapter 2

Accounting for Revenues

9-2-101. Sources of revenue.

The revenue of the state is derived from taxes on property, incomes, sales of land, the exercise of privileges, litigation, from fines, forfeitures and escheats, from merchants, from peddlers, and from inheritance taxes, jail fees and interest.

Code 1858, § 538; Shan., § 685; mod. Code 1932, § 1081; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-201.

Cross-References. Department of finance and administration, title 4, ch. 3, part 10.

Disposition of fines in criminal cases, §40-24-106.

Inheritance taxes, title 67, ch. 8, parts 3-5.

Theft of property, §39-14-103.

9-2-102. Uniform accounting system.

It is the duty of the department of audit to prescribe a uniform system of bookkeeping designating the character of books, reports, receipts, and records, and the method of keeping same, in all state, county, and municipal offices, including utility districts, which handle public funds. It is the duty of all officials to adopt and use the system and the character of books, reports, and records designated; provided, that the comptroller of the treasury may approve any existing system. The approval of such systems by the comptroller of the treasury is subject to the concurrence of the commissioner of finance and administration.

It is the duty of all local governments that are subject to the audit requirements of the comptroller of the treasury and that handle public funds to close their official accounting records and to have those records available for audit no later than two (2) months after the close of their fiscal year.

Acts 1907, ch. 602, § 78; Shan., § 969a3; Code 1932, § 1681; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 1681; Acts 1975, ch. 173, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-202; Acts 2015, ch. 41, § 1.

9-2-103. Receipts required.

Each state, county and municipal official who receives any sum or sums in such official's capacity shall issue to the payer thereof a receipt and shall retain a duplicate thereof in the office of such official; provided, that this provision for official receipts shall not apply to the payment of funds from one department or division of the state government to another such department or division. Any system now in use shall be acceptable if approved by the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 1947, ch. 224, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 1902.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-203; Acts 1995, ch. 70, § 1.

9-2-104. Issuance, preservation and numbering of receipts.

The receipt shall be issued in duplicate and a copy thereof shall be retained by the person so receiving such money and shall be available to the state auditors upon demand.

The receipts shall be in a well-bound book, or on a form approved by the comptroller of the treasury, and shall be prenumbered consecutively.

Acts 1947, ch. 224, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 1902.1; Acts 1977, ch. 103, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-204.

9-2-105. Furnishing receipt books.

It is the duty of the chief administrative officer of the municipality to procure such receipt books for municipal officials, it is the duty of the county mayor to procure such receipt books for county officials, and it is the duty of the department head of the state agency to procure the same for state officials. The state or county official issuing receipts hereunder shall preserve such official's copy of such receipt book until the same has been audited as provided by law, after which time such official may make such disposition thereof as deemed advisable, unless otherwise directed by the comptroller of the treasury. The cost of printing the receipt books by the county or municipal officials shall be paid in the same manner now provided for the payment for other office supplies. The cost of receipt books used in state offices shall be paid in the same manner as now provided for the payment for other state office supplies.

Acts 1947, ch. 224, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 1902.2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-205; Acts 1995, ch. 70, §§ 2-5; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

9-2-106. Penalty for violations.

Any person violating any of the provisions of §§9-2-103 —9-2-105 commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1947, ch. 224, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 1902.3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-206; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

9-2-107. Settlement for school funds.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall settle with the banks, insurance companies, tax collectors, and clerks, and all other corporations, companies, officers and persons, all accounts of moneys due from them, or any of them, which have been appropriated to the use of common schools, and which are by law subject to annual distribution, and shall charge the same, and keep a full account thereof, in books to be kept for the purpose, and shall issue such commissioner's warrant for the payment thereof into the treasury in the same manner as for the payment of the revenue of the state.

Code 1858, § 208 (deriv. Acts 1837-1838, ch. 148, § 45); Shan., § 258; Code 1932, § 202; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 24, 29; C. Supp. 1950, § 202; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-207.

9-2-108. Reports of clerks and judges.

The clerks of all the courts and every judge of the court of general sessions shall make a report, in writing, under oath, to the county mayor, giving the names of each person, in alphabetical order, from whom such clerk or judge has received state, county, or municipal revenue during the quarter next preceding the day on which the report shall be made, and also giving the amount of state, county, and municipal revenue received from each person, when paid, and on what account paid, stating particularly the nature of the privilege, if a privilege, and separating in such clerk or judge's report the state, county, and municipal revenue received by such clerk or judge. Such reports shall be sworn to before some officer authorized to administer oaths, before their presentation to the county mayor. A judge who has not received any revenue shall not be required to make such report.

Acts 1875, ch. 46, §§ 1, 3, 5; Shan., §§ 1011, 1013, 1016a1; Code 1932, §§ 1739, 1741, 1745; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-208; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

9-2-109. Time of reports — Filing.

The report required by § 9-2-108 shall be made quarterly, on the first Monday in January, April, July and October.

The county mayor shall note on each report the day the same was by such county mayor received, and shall cause the report to be kept fastened in book form and file the same with the county register.

The reports shall be public records, open to the inspection of the public, free of charge, whenever such inspection may be demanded.

Acts 1875, ch. 46, § 2; 1877, ch. 88, § 1; Shan., § 1012; Code 1932, § 1740; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-209; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

9-2-110. Failure of judge or clerk to report.

If any judge or clerk who has received any revenue fails to make such report in the time prescribed, such judge or clerk shall be subject to presentment; and, upon conviction, a judge shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) and a clerk not less than fifty dollars ($50.00).

If the jury by whom the defendant is tried and convicted finds that the failure to make such report was willful or due to gross neglect, such clerk or judge shall be removed from office, as a part of the judgment of the court.

Acts 1875, ch. 46, § 5; Shan., §§ 1018, 1019; mod. Code 1932, §§ 1747, 1748; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-210.

9-2-111. Perjury by judge or clerk.

If any clerk or judge of the court of general sessions knowingly omits to charge in such clerk's or judge's account any sum of money for which, by law, such clerk or judge is liable to account, and swear to the statement, knowing it to be incorrect, and produce such false account to the county mayor for settlement, such clerk or judge commits perjury.

Code 1858, § 512 (deriv. Acts 1807, ch. 66, § 2); Shan., § 1020; mod. Code 1932, § 1749; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-211; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Perjury, §39-16-702.

9-2-112. Examination of reports by grand jury — Penalties for violations.

It is the duty of the grand jury, impaneled next after the filing of the reports by clerks or judges, to examine the same, in order to ascertain their correctness, and if such grand jury shall find any omission in the reports, or any amount erroneously charged, or any error whatever in the reports, and shall be of opinion that such omission, mistake or error was corruptly or fraudulently made, such grand jury shall present the officer who made the report.

Upon conviction, the officer and such officer's sureties shall be bound to pay whatever fine and costs may be adjudged against the officer.

If the traverse jury should find the omission or other error to have been willfully made, then the court, in addition to the fine and costs, shall also remove the officer from office.

The grand jury has the power to send for persons and papers to facilitate its investigations into the correctness of the reports.

Acts 1875, ch. 46, § 4; Shan., § 1021; Code 1932, § 1750; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-212.

9-2-113. Payment by judge.

The judges shall, within ten (10) days after the time required for making such report, pay into the hands of the county trustee the amount of county revenue by them last reported, and into the hands of the county clerk the amount of state revenue by them last reported, and to the treasurer or other proper financial officer of the municipality the amount of municipal revenue in their hands.

Acts 1875, ch. 46, § 5; Shan., § 1014; Code 1932, § 1742; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-213.

9-2-114. Payment by clerks.

The clerks of all courts shall, within twenty (20) days after the time required for making such report, pay over to the county trustee the amount of the county revenue then in their hands, and to the state treasurer the amount of state revenue then in their hands, and to the state treasurer or other proper financial officer of the municipality the amount of municipal revenue in their hands.

Acts 1875, ch. 46, § 5; Shan., § 1015; mod. Code 1932, § 1743; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-214.

9-2-115. Failure of clerk or judge to pay over.

Any judge or clerk failing to make the payments as required of them, respectively, by §§9-2-113 and9-2-114, shall be proceeded against by the officer to whom the payment should have been made, by motion on such judge's or clerk's official bond.

Acts 1875, ch. 46, § 5; Shan., § 1016; mod. Code 1932, § 1744; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-215.

9-2-116. Failure of clerk or judge to produce proper receipt.

If any clerk fails to produce the trustee's receipt, when called on by the judge of the court of general sessions or the county mayor, or fails to produce the receipts of the commissioner of revenue and of the state treasurer, when called on by the county mayor, or by the district attorney general or attorney general and reporter; or if the receipt produced shows, from its date or otherwise, that the clerk has not complied with the requirements of the law, the court shall dismiss such clerk from office and appoint another in such clerk's stead, to hold the office until such clerk's successor is elected.

Code 1858, §§ 511, 714 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 147, § 2); Shan., § 1022; Code 1932, § 1751; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 50, 51; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; modified; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-216; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

9-2-117. Judgment for trustee against clerk or judge.

If any clerk or judge fails or refuses to pay to the county trustee any county money collected by such clerk or judge, the county trustee may proceed, by motion in the circuit court of the county, and the court shall give judgment against such clerk or judge and the sureties of such clerk or judge for the penalty of the bond, and award execution.

Code 1858, § 513 (deriv. Acts 1839-1840, ch. 85, § 1); Shan., § 1023; mod. Code 1932, § 1752; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-217.

9-2-118. Satisfaction of judgment.

The clerk or judge may discharge such judgment by producing to the trustee the warrant of the county mayor, to pay the amount found by the trustee due to the county on settlement of the account of such clerk or judge, and paying the amount to the trustee, who shall receive the same in discharge of the judgment, leaving such clerk or judge and the sureties of such clerk or judge liable for the costs of the suit.

Code 1858, § 514 (deriv. Acts 1839-1840, ch. 85, § 1); Shan., § 1024; mod. Code 1932, § 1753; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-218; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

9-2-119. Commissions lost by default.

On settlement, the defaulting clerk or judge is not allowed a credit for any commissions on the money in regard to which such clerk or judge made the default.

Code 1858, § 515 (deriv. Acts 1839-1840, ch. 85, § 1); Shan., § 1025; mod. Code 1932, § 1754; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-219.

9-2-120. [Reserved.]

If such clerk or judge, after settlement and obtaining a warrant to pay into the county treasury the amount found due from such clerk or judge to the county, fails to pay it, the trustee shall, in like manner, cause judgment to be taken against such clerk or judge and the sureties of such clerk or judge for the amount found due the county by the account, with interest thereon from the time the money should have been paid, with twelve and one-half percent (12.5%) damages, and costs.

Code 1858, § 516 (deriv. Acts 1839-1840, ch. 85, § 2); Shan., § 1027; Code 1932, § 1756; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-221.

9-2-122. Clerk's records furnished to county mayor.

The county clerk shall, on demand, furnish to the county mayor:

A list of the amount of taxes put into the hands of the collector, and due and owing to the county for any year;

A statement, with sufficient vouchers, showing the amount of moneys paid by the clerk to the trustee, as required by law, for fines and forfeitures;

The amount of all appropriations made for the year by the county legislative body; and

All necessary documents and vouchers, showing any receipt or disbursement of the county moneys.

Code 1858, § 517; Shan., § 1028; Code 1932, § 1757; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-222; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

9-2-123. [Reserved.]

If it is made satisfactorily to appear to the court that the execution was placed in the hands of the sheriff, against whom the motion is made, and that such sheriff has failed to return the same, the court shall render judgment against the sheriff and the sureties of such sheriff for the amount due the state, or county, or common school fund, or other persons, for costs and the costs of the motion.

Code 1858, § 717 (deriv. Acts 1833, ch. 43, § 1); Shan., § 1030; Code 1932, § 1759; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-224.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 477.

9-2-125. Notice of motion against sheriff.

No notice of this motion is required when it is made at the first term after the execution has been placed in the sheriff's hands; but if the motion is made at a subsequent term, it shall be entered upon the minutes, and docketed as a suit, and proceeded with on the second or subsequent day of the next succeeding term, as if notice had been given.

Code 1858, § 718 (deriv. Acts 1833, ch. 43, § 2); Shan., § 1031; Code 1932, § 1760; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-225.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 477.

9-2-126. [Reserved.]

Every county official collecting or receiving public money from any source whatsoever belonging to or for the use of the state shall comply with §9-4-301.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 28; 1937, ch. 107, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.28; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-227; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 6.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Stare Decisis, § 5.

9-2-128. Prosecution for failure to pay receipts into treasury.

Any of the aforementioned departments, institutions, offices, agencies, officers or employees who fail to pay immediately into the state treasury any money belonging to the state as directed in § 9-2-127 are subject to punishment for theft.

The venue of any such prosecution is the county in which such departments, institutions, offices, agencies, officers or employees serve in their official capacity.

Acts 1943, ch. 142, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.28; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-228; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 21.

Cross-References. Territorial jurisdiction, §39-11-103.

9-2-129 — 9-2-136. [Reserved.]

Each county office, department, board, commission or agency charged with the duty of disbursing county funds in counties which do not have a central accounting system approved by the comptroller of the treasury shall file quarterly with the county fiscal agent a sworn itemized report listing by fund accounts all accounts payable and other obligations, including notes payable. Such report shall be made and sworn to by the principal officer, chair or employee in charge of the department, office, board, commission or agency. A copy of the report shall be filed with the county clerk.

Acts 1957, ch. 355, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A., § 9-237.

Cross-References. Penalty for failure to perform duty under section, §9-2-139.

9-2-138. Reconciliation of county fund accounts with trustee's records — Monthly and quarterly reports.

The administrative officers and employees shall reconcile their respective fund accounts with the records of the county trustee, and shall make a report at the end of each month showing the condition of the respective fund accounts. As to each fund, the report shall include the balance at the beginning of the month, receipts and expenditures for the month, and the balance at the end of the month. The monthly reports shall also include a reconciliation of the trustee's balances with the balances of the department, office, board, commission or agency. The reports shall be retained in the permanent files of the department, office, board, commission or agency.

At the end of each quarter, the officers charged herein with making monthly reports shall prepare a quarterly report summarizing the monthly reports of that quarter, and a copy of the same shall be filed with the county fiscal agent.

Acts 1957, ch. 355, § 2; T.C.A., § 9-238.

Cross-References. Penalty for failure to perform duty under section, §9-2-139.

9-2-139. Failure of county officers and employees to file reports or reconcile accounts a misdemeanor.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any county officer or any employee to fail to perform any duty required by §§9-2-137 and9-2-138.

Acts 1957, ch. 355, § 3; T.C.A., § 9-239; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

9-2-121. Failure to pay on warrant.

9-2-124. Judgment against sheriff.

9-2-127. Payments by county officials into treasury or state depository.

9-2-137. Counties not having approved central accounting system — Quarterly report of accounts payable and obligations.